Hawaii statutes.
§572-3 Contracted without the State.
Marriages between two individuals regardless of gender and legal where
contracted shall be held legal in the courts of this State. [CC 1859, §1290; RL
1925, §2945; RL 1935, §4632; RL 1945, §12353; RL 1955, §323-3; HRS §572-3; am L
1994, c 217, §4; am L Sp 2013 2d, c 1, §4]

Rules of Court

Determination of foreign law, see HFCR rule 44.1.

Proof of official record, see HFCR rule 44.

Case Notes

If legal where entered into, legal everywhere unless odious
by common consent of civilized nations. 3 H. 489; 12 H. 329.

Presumption of validity. 29 H. 716.

Mexican proxy marriage. 47 H. 345, 388 P.2d 846.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next